California statutes. Education Code
(iii) An expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources. The commission shall adjust the 2023–24 amount of seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898) annually thereafter based on the percentage change in the minimum wage, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.

(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for
 dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(E) If a student’s total award under this article, in combination with other grants and scholarships treated as estimated financial assistance (EFA) or other financial assistance (OFA) pursuant to federal financial aid regulations, exceeds the allowable gift aid under those regulations, the award under this article shall be reduced to the greatest allowable award to maintain compliance pursuant to federal financial aid regulations.

(F) If an award in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of less than
 three hundred dollars ($300) is identified following the determination of a student’s scholarship award under this article, the student’s scholarship award under this article shall not require a recalculation.

(G) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (E) and (F), if a foster youth or former foster youth receives additional financial aid following the determination of the student’s scholarship award under this article, the student’s scholarship award under this article shall not require a recalculation unless a recalculation is necessary in order to comply with federal financial aid regulations.

(3) (A) A student shall be eligible to receive an award if all of the following requirements are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year:

(B) (i) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s annual household income does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed for the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.

(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s
 annual household income does not exceed the following amounts:

(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.

(II) One hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($133,000) if the student is a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.

(III) One hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($116,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents.

(iii) For awards distributed for the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income levels set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.

(C) (i) For each academic year from 2015–16 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s household asset level shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed in the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. For purposes of
 this article, student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.

(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s household asset level does not exceed the following amounts:

(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.

(II) Ninety-six thousand dollars ($96,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents or a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.

(iii) For awards distributed in the 2023–24
 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, a student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.

(D) The student satisfies the eligibility requirements for a Cal Grant award pursuant to either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 69433.9, except that a student who is exempt from nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5 shall not be required to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9.

(E) The student is exempt from paying nonresident tuition.

(F) The student completes and submits a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or a California Dream Act application. The FAFSA or California Dream Act application must be submitted or postmarked by no later than March 2.

(G) The student makes a timely application or applications for all other federal, state, or institutionally administered grants or fee waivers for which the student is eligible.

(H) The student maintains satisfactory academic progress in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 69432.7.

(I) The student is pursuing the student’s first undergraduate baccalaureate degree or has completed a baccalaureate degree and has been admitted to, and is enrolled in, a program of professional teacher preparation at an institution approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(J) The student is enrolled at least part time.

(4) (A) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the percentages specified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by 0.6-percent increments per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of annual household income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), to a minimum 10 percent, provided that no scholarship award shall be provided to a student with an annual household income exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Beginning with award calculations for the 2016–17 academic year, and for
 subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the income levels specified in this subparagraph by the percentage change in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution and shall adjust the incremental reduction accordingly to ensure that a minimum of 10 percent of mandatory systemwide tuition and fees for an academic year are awarded. This reduction shall be in addition to any reduction required by Section 70023.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, for any student who qualifies for a scholarship award of at least one dollar ($1), the minimum annual scholarship amount for full-time enrollment is ninety dollars ($90).

(5) (A) For the 2014–15, 2015–16, and 2016–17
 academic years, the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be 35 percent, 50 percent, and 75 percent, respectively, of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.

(B) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in subparagraph (D), the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be determined by the percentage determined pursuant to subparagraph (C) of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.

(C) The commission shall annually determine the percentage required for purposes of subparagraph (B) by taking the amount appropriated for purposes of this program for the applicable award year, less the amount necessary to fund subparagraph (D), and dividing that by the sum of the projected amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of
 paragraph (2) for the applicable award year for all eligible students, except those affected by subparagraph (D).

(D) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, a current or former foster youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 69433.6, shall receive a scholarship award in the full amount determined in subparagraphs (C) or (D) of paragraph (2), as adjusted, if applicable, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(b) In order for students enrolled in their respective segments to remain eligible to receive a scholarship award under this article, the University of California and the California State University shall not supplant their respective institutional need-based or merit-based grants with the funds provided for scholarships under this article. The University of California and the California State University shall ensure that the amount of
 institutional student aid provided in each academic year beginning with the 2022–23 academic year is adjusted annually to account for increases in systemwide undergraduate enrollment, as applicable, such that the proportion of institutional student aid relative to systemwide undergraduate enrollment is maintained at a level at least equivalent to the level maintained for undergraduate students during the 2021–22 academic year. The University of California and the California State University shall also ensure that at least 33 percent of the revenues of an increase to existing mandatory systemwide fees charged to undergraduate students is set aside by the regents or the trustees, as applicable, for institutional student aid to assist resident undergraduate students, including those undergraduate students exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Sections 68075.5 and 68130.5, and families in meeting the total cost of education.

(c) (1) The University of California and the California State University shall report on the implementation of this article as part of the report made pursuant to Section 66021.1. At a minimum, the report shall add the following information, by parental income level or expected family contribution deciles, for the prior academic year:

(A) The number and percentage of students receiving an award under this article and the average dollar amount of that award.

(B) The number and percentage of students receiving a student loan and the average amount borrowed.

(2) The report shall also include the following information by campus for the prior academic year:

(A) The cost of attendance for undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off
 campus, or at home with parents).

(B) The number and percentage of undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).

(d) (1) A Middle Class Scholarship Program award authorized pursuant to this article shall be defined as a full-time equivalent grant. An award to a part-time student shall be a fraction of a full-time grant. For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, an award to a part-time student shall be determined by the proportionate amount charged for systemwide tuition and fees. A part-time student shall not be discriminated against in the selection of Middle Class Scholarship Program awards. For purposes of this section, “full-time student” and “part-time student” have the same meaning as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 69432.7.

(2) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, an award to a student enrolled in six to eight semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than one-half of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time. An award to a student enrolled in 9 to 11 semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than three-quarters of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 12.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

70022.5.

(a) A scholarship award under this article may be renewed for a total of the equivalent of four years of full-time attendance in an undergraduate program or, for a community college award recipient, the equivalent of two years of full-time upper division coursework attendance in the community college baccalaureate degree program. Commencing with the 2016–17 academic year, the total number of years of eligibility for grants pursuant to this article shall be based on the student’s educational level in his or her course of study as designated by the institution of attendance when the recipient initially receives payment for a grant.

(b) For a student enrolled in an institutionally prescribed five-year undergraduate program, a scholarship award under this article may
 be renewed for a total of up to five academic years of attendance as long as the student meets the requirements of Section 70022.

(c) A recipient of a scholarship award under this article who has completed a baccalaureate degree, and who has been admitted to and is enrolled in a program of professional teacher preparation at an institution approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, is eligible for, but not entitled to, renewal of the scholarship award for an additional academic year of full-time attendance as long as the student meets the requirements of Section 70022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 438, Sec. 6.   (SB 1314)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

70023.

(a) For each academic year, the commission shall determine an amount sufficient, when combined with other federal, state, or institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers received by eligible students from other sources, to provide scholarships to eligible students in the amounts described in paragraphs (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 70022. The University of California, the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the commission with any financial aid data that are necessary to determine these amounts.

(b) (1) The commission shall annually determine if the amounts appropriated under this section in each fiscal year are
 sufficient to cover the costs of the scholarships projected to be awarded pursuant to the program. If those amounts are not sufficient for this purpose, the scholarships shall be reduced proportionately by an equal percentage for all recipients of scholarships under this article. Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, this reduction shall not apply to a scholarship award under this article for current or former foster youth described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 70022.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, for any student who qualifies for a scholarship award under this article of at least one dollar ($1), the minimum annual scholarship amount for full-time enrollment shall be ninety dollars ($90).

(c) (1) Each institution participating in the scholarship program under this article shall sign an institutional participation agreement with the commission acknowledging the institution’s willingness to administer the scholarship program pursuant to this article, Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and guidance developed by the commission. The institutional participation agreement shall be developed through collaboration and consultation between the commission and the office of the President of the University of California, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) The commission may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this article under subdivision (b) as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall not remain in effect more than 180 days unless the commission complies with all provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as required by subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government
 Code.

(d) The unencumbered balance, as of June 30 of each fiscal year, of the amount appropriated from the Middle Class Scholarship Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) shall revert to the General Fund.

(e) (1) Upon order of the Director of Finance, the following amounts shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Middle Class Scholarship Fund, and are hereby appropriated to the commission for allocation pursuant to this article:

(A) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, one hundred seven million dollars ($107,000,000).

(B) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, eighty-two million dollars ($82,000,000).

(C) For the 2016–17 fiscal year, seventy-one million two hundred
 forty-four thousand dollars ($71,244,000).

(D) For the 2017–18 fiscal year, ninety-nine million nine hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars ($99,938,000).

(E) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, one hundred four million three hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($104,345,000).

(F) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, one hundred sixteen million five hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($116,557,000).

(G) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, one hundred fourteen million one hundred seventy-one thousand dollars ($114,171,000).

(H) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, one hundred nine million nine hundred sixty-one thousand dollars ($109,961,000).

(2) An
 annual appropriation to the commission is hereby established in the amounts and for the fiscal years described in paragraph (1) to carry out the purposes of this section and Section 70022.

(3) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the annual appropriation to the commission to carry out the purposes of this section and Section 70022 shall be determined in the annual Budget Act.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that any savings realized from changes made to the allocations under this subdivision by a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill for the 2015–16 fiscal year shall be used to support higher education.

(5) The funds transferred and appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only be available for encumbrance in the fiscal year in which they are transferred, and the General Fund
 shall have no liability or any obligation beyond the transfers explicitly authorized in paragraph (1) unless a subsequent transfer or allocation is required pursuant to statute.

(6) In any fiscal year, additional appropriations may be enacted pursuant to statute to carry out the purposes of this article.

(7) (A) Beginning with the Governor’s Budget proposal for the 2014–15 fiscal year, and in the Governor’s Budget proposal for each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Finance shall include a fund condition statement for the Middle Class Scholarship Fund for the fiscal year of the proposed budget and the two immediately preceding fiscal years prepared in accordance with existing law.

(B) Upon order of the Director of Finance and for the 2013–14 to 2021–22 fiscal years, inclusive, if the May
 Revision projects a budget deficit for the next fiscal year, the amount specified in paragraph (1) for the fiscal year for which the budget deficit is projected may be reduced by up to 33 percent.

(f) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for its purposes, the commission may begin implementation of, and establish outreach services relating to, this article.

(g) The commission may adopt regulations it deems necessary for the implementation of this article. If the commission adopts regulations pursuant to this subdivision, the regulations may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the
 adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 745, Sec. 4.   (SB 148)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. California DREAM Loan Program [70030. - 70039.]

70030.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California DREAM Loan Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 754, Sec. 3.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

70031.

The California DREAM Loan Program, which may also be referred to as the DREAM Program, is hereby established.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 754, Sec. 3.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

70032.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) An “academic year” is July 1 to June 30, inclusive. The start date of a session shall determine the academic year in which it is included.

(b) “Award year” means one academic year, or the equivalent, of attendance at a qualifying institution.

(c) “Commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(d) “Cost of attendance” means the student’s tuition and fees, books and supplies, living expenses, transportation expenses, and any other student expenses used to calculate a student’s financial need for purposes of federal Title
 IV student aid programs.

(e) “Enrollment status” means part-time status or full-time status of a student at a qualifying institution.

(f) “Expected family contribution” means a student’s expected family contribution calculated, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69506, according to the federal methodology (as established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.)).

(g) “Financial need” means a student’s financial need calculated pursuant to the federal financial need methodology (as established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.)).

(h) “Graduate program” means a program of study leading to a graduate or professional degree, including,
 but not limited to, a teaching credential, the prerequisite for which is a baccalaureate degree or undergraduate degree.

(i) “Grant-eligible student” means a student who has applied for financial aid using the application established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69508.5, known as the Dream Act Application and has been previously awarded a Cal Grant, Middle Class Scholarship, or institutional need-based financial aid.

(j) “Instructional program” means a program of study that results in the award of a baccalaureate degree or undergraduate certificate, or undergraduate coursework in a program of study leading directly to a first professional degree for which no baccalaureate degree or undergraduate degree is awarded.

(k) “Participating institution” means any campus of the California State
 University or the University of California that elects to participate in the DREAM Program pursuant to the requirements specified for a qualifying institution as set forth in this article.

(l) “Satisfactory academic progress” means those criteria required by applicable federal standards published in Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A participating institution may adopt regulations defining “satisfactory academic progress” in a manner that duplicates those federal standards, provided that, to the extent consistent with applicable federal standards, the regulations adopted by the participating institution provide that homelessness, as defined as a “homeless individual” within the meaning of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11302(a)), or as defined as a “homeless child or youth,” as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 11434a(2)), is an extenuating circumstance for students who are otherwise unable to meet the requirements deemed to constitute “satisfactory academic progress” at that institution. The institution may consider this extenuating circumstance, in its discretion, to the extent consistent with federal standards, to alter or excuse compliance with those progress requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

70033.

(a) Commencing with the 2015–16 academic year, a student attending a participating institution may receive a loan under the DREAM Program if the student satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) The student is exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5, or meets equivalent requirements adopted by the Regents of the University of California.

(2) The student applies for financial aid using the application established by the
 commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69508.5, known as the Dream Act Application.

(3) The student is enrolled at least half time in good standing in one of the following programs at a participating institution:

(A) An instructional program.

(B) Commencing with the 2020–21 academic year, a graduate program.

(4) The student is determined by the participating institution to have financial need.

(5) The student maintains satisfactory academic progress at the participating institution.

(6) The student is not incarcerated.

(7) The student is not in default on any federal student loan, state student loan, or student loan issued by the California State University or the University of California.

(8) The student is enrolled in one of the following programs:

(A) A program eligible for participation in the Cal Grant Program.

(B) Commencing with the 2020–21 academic year, a state-supported graduate or professional degree program.

(b) (1) The
 commission or the participating institution shall require the student to affirm in writing that the student satisfies the requirements of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a).

(2) A student seeking an award shall authorize the commission to access any information pertinent to certify that the student meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) The commission,
 in collaboration with the participating institution, shall certify that the student satisfies all of the requirements specified in subdivision (a) before the participating institution may issue an award to the student pursuant to this article.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that this article is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 526, Sec. 2.   (SB 354)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

70034.

(a) The amount of a DREAM loan offered to an individual student by a participating institution shall be determined by the institution, subject to the following provisions:

(1) The loan may not exceed the financial need of the student.

(2) (A) A student who is enrolled in an undergraduate program may not borrow more than four thousand dollars ($4,000) under this
 program within a single academic year.

(B) A student who is enrolled in a graduate program may not borrow more than twenty thousand five hundred dollars ($20,500) under this program within a single academic year.

(3) (A) A student who is enrolled in
 an undergraduate program may not borrow, as an undergraduate student, more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in the aggregate under the program.

(B) A student who is enrolled in a graduate program may not borrow, as a graduate student, more than one hundred eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($118,500) in the aggregate under the program.

(C) A student may not borrow more than one hundred thirty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($138,500) in the aggregate under the program, consistent with the limitations specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(4) The proportion of program funding used for instructional programs and for graduate programs shall be determined at the discretion of the participating institution. Priority shall be given to loans for instructional programs.

(b) The interest rate for loans issued under the program shall be the same as the
 then-current interest rate for undergraduate loans under the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087a et seq.).

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the standard repayment term for a DREAM loan shall be 10 years. Repayment shall commence following a six-month grace period that begins when a student graduates or ceases to maintain at least half-time enrollment in a degree or certificate program.

(d) On or before January 1, 2020, a participating institution shall adopt procedures allowing a borrower to select an income-based repayment plan for the repayment of a DREAM loan, in accordance with the standards set forth in the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program for income-based repayment plans.

(e) Interest shall not accrue on a DREAM loan during periods of at least half-time
 enrollment in a degree or certificate program or during the six-month grace period specified in subdivision (c).

(f) Eligibility for deferment, discharge, or forbearance of a DREAM loan shall be determined by the participating institution in accordance with the standards set forth in the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program.

(g) On or before January 1, 2024, a participating institution shall establish loan forgiveness options for borrowers who receive a DREAM loan with similar standards as those set forth in the Federal Perkins Loan Program.

(h) (1) A borrower shall qualify for administrative relief consistent with the standards set forth in the Federal Direct Loan Program during periods of national emergency declared by the President of the United States.

(2) A borrower shall qualify for any state of emergency administrative forbearance on student loans that is provided by the Governor by executive order or the participating institution.

(3) A borrower shall be granted administrative relief for 90 days if the borrower lives or works where a natural disaster has occurred upon notification by the borrower, a member of the borrower’s family, or another reliable source that the borrower has been affected by the natural disaster.

(i) Participating institutions shall use a common promissory note, approved by the Treasurer, to issue DREAM loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   (AB 681)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

70035.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, each fiscal year, funds shall be appropriated in the annual Budget Act to participating institutions for purposes of the DREAM Program.

(b) The annual Budget Act shall allocate funding to participating institutions based on the number of eligible students attending the institution who applied for student financial aid pursuant to Section 69508.5 the prior academic year.

(c) (1) Each participating institution shall deposit funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) in a DREAM revolving fund established by each institution, subject to subdivision (e). DREAM loans shall be awarded from, and DREAM loan repayments shall be deposited
 into, these revolving funds.

(2) In accordance with subdivision (d), participating institutions shall make DREAM loan repayment revenue available to offset state and institutional contributions to the DREAM loan program so that, as much as practicable, the respective annual costs to the state and to participating institutions shall be reduced equally.

(d) At the start of each academic year, before DREAM loans for that academic year are awarded, each participating institution shall contribute discretionary funds into its DREAM revolving fund so that the sum of the institution’s contribution of funds and the institution’s share of DREAM loan repayments equals or exceeds 50 percent of all funds in the institution’s DREAM revolving fund for each year of an institution’s participation.

(e) A participating institution
 shall not receive any additional state funds if the receipt of these funds would reduce the percentage of the DREAM revolving fund derived from the sum of the institution’s contribution of funds and DREAM loan repayments to less than the specified percentage of all funds in the institution’s DREAM revolving fund as described in subdivision (d).

(f) (1) In the event that an institution terminates its participation in the DREAM Program, the institution shall continue to service DREAM loans, collect DREAM loan repayments, and perform all due diligence required by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) until the last students at that institution issued loans under the DREAM Program before the institution terminated its participation have repaid their loans.

(2) An institution described in paragraph (1) that terminates its
 participation in the DREAM Program shall annually repay all funds provided by the state as the institution collects DREAM loan repayments.

(g) (1) The California State University and the University of California shall annually report to the Legislature as part of their respective annual financial aid reports the dollar amount of each DREAM loan awarded and number of students for whom a DREAM loan was awarded that academic year.

(2) Each institution, including an institution described in subdivision (f), shall annually report all of the following:

(A) The total amount of funding in the institution’s DREAM revolving fund.

(B) The annual amount contributed by the state to the institution’s DREAM revolving fund.

(C) The annual amount contributed by the institution to the institution’s DREAM revolving fund.

(D) The annual administrative costs of the DREAM Program at the institution.

(E) The annual amount contributed by DREAM loan repayments to the institution’s DREAM revolving fund.

(F) The annual amount of DREAM loans issued by campus.

(G) The annual amount of remaining DREAM loan debt owed by borrowers.

(H) The number of borrowers in DREAM loan income-driven repayment, deferment, discharge, forbearance, and loan forgiveness at the end of each fiscal year.

(I) Borrower
 demographic information, which shall include, but is not limited to, age, gender, race, ethnicity, completed education level, and family education level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 484, Sec. 3.   (AB 2004)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

70035.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish the DREAM grant program.

(b) Commencing with the 2024–25 academic year, a grant-eligible student attending a participating institution may receive a DREAM grant pursuant to this section.

(c) Each participating institution may award DREAM grants to grant-eligible students if that institution has unawarded funds in the institution’s DREAM revolving fund that were new state, institutional matching, or loan repayment funds deposited during the previous academic year pursuant to Section 70035.

(d) DREAM grants shall be provided during the academic year immediately
 following the academic year in which there was an unawarded DREAM revolving fund balance.

(e) In a given academic year, a DREAM grant shall not exceed a student’s financial need.

(f) The amount of a DREAM grant offered to an individual student by a participating institution shall be determined by the institution. Priority shall be given to DREAM grants for instructional programs.

(g) A DREAM grant awarded pursuant to this section shall not count
 towards the annual and aggregate borrowing limits described in subdivision (a) of Section 70034.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

70036.

Each participating institution is responsible for all the following:

(a) The participating institution shall determine a student’s eligibility for a DREAM loan.

(b) The participating institution shall award DREAM loan funds to students.

(c) The participating institution shall provide entrance and exit loan counseling to borrowers that is generally comparable to that required by federal student loan programs. Exit loan counseling shall include, but is not limited to, information about DREAM loan repayment, including repayment options, forbearance, deferment, discharge, and forgiveness.

(d) The
 participating institution shall service DREAM loans, collect DREAM loan repayments, and perform all of the due diligence required by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(e) The participating institution shall establish mechanisms for recording the annual amount of the DREAM loan borrowed by each recipient, and the aggregate amount of DREAM loans borrowed by each recipient, in order to comply with the annual and aggregate borrowing limits set forth in Section 70034.

(f) The participating institution shall post information about the DREAM loan on the institution’s internet website. That information shall include, but is not limited to, DREAM loan eligibility requirements, DREAM loan interest rates for the past five years, how to apply for and accept a DREAM loan, and information about DREAM loan repayment, including repayment options, forbearance,
 deferment, discharge, and forgiveness. The participating institution shall update its internet website to include information about administrative relief granted to borrowers.

(g) The participating institution shall award DREAM grants to grant-eligible students.
